src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1geo_tsSmorf !!= * @CODE@ Kangerluarsoruseq
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsip	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminngaannit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminngaanniit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimiit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitut	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimik	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ

LEXICON Z1geo+ssPZ  !!= * @CODE@ Ilulissat
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssat	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssat	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssanut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssanit	AblVb ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssaninngaannit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssaniit	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssaninngaanniit	K_plur ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssani	LokVb ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssatut	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssanik	K_plur ; !Z1geo+ssPZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Pl:%>%VCTRUNCssatigut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo+ssPZ

LEXICON Z1geo_oqsZ  !!= * @CODE@ Finland
! :- Z1geo_oqsZ-suf ;    !SUB
    Z1geo_oqsZ-suf ;    !SUB
LEXICON Z1geo_oqsZ-suf  !SUB
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:%EPENT	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg+Err/Sub:i	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>ip	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-ip	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg+Err/Sub:%>-p	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ !til USA-p. Der skal laves en anden løsning til forkortelser i stedet.
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>imut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-imut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-imit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>iminngaannit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-iminngaannit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>iminngaanniit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-minngaanniit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imiit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-imiit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>imi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-imi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>itut	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-itut	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>imik	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-imik	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>ikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-ikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ

LEXICON Z1geo_oqs-bestZ
+Sem/Geo+Orth/Alt+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCa    Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCap	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-p	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCamut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-mut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCamit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-mit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCaminngaannit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-minngaannit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCaminngaanniit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-minngaanniit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCamiit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-miit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCami	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-mi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCatut	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-tut	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCamik	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-mik	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCakkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%VCTRUNCa-kkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_oqsZ


LEXICON Z1geo_oqseZ  !!= * @CODE@ Thule
! :- Z1geo_oqseZ-suf ;   !SUB
    Z1geo_oqseZ-suf ;   !SUB
LEXICON Z1geo_oqseZ-suf !SUB
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:%>e	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>ip	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>imut	TrmVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imit	AblVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>iminngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>imiit	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>iminngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>imi	LokVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>itut	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>imik	Krestr ; !Z1geo_oqseZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>ikkut	ViaVb ; !Z1geo_oqseZ


LEXICON Z2-geoSZ  !!= * @CODE@ Ikerasaarsuk
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCup	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>mut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>mit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>miit	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>mik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ

LEXICON Z2+lgeoSZ  !!= * @CODE@ Nanortalik:Nanorta
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:%>lik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>llip	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>llup	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>liup	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>limmut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>limmit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>limminngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>limmiit	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>limminngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>limmi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>lik-mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>littut	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>limmik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>likkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ


LEXICON Z2-geo_uukSZ  !!= * @CODE@ Nuuk
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCp	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>mut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>mit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaannit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>miit	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>mik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ

LEXICON Z2-geo_specielSZ  !!= * @CODE@ Qinngorput – Qinngorpummi, Qinngorpumi
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCp	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ 
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>mut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmut	TrmVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>mit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmit	AblVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCminngaannit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>miit	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUCmiit	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>minngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCminngaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi	LokVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%TRUNCtut	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>mik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCmik	Krestr ; !Z2-geoSZ
+Sem/Geo+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%TRUNCkkut	ViaVb ; !Z2-geoSZ
